Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1466.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 6121 of Title 7 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a paragraph to read:§ 6121. General requirements.A licensee shall do all of the following:* * *(16) If the licensee accepts applications for reverse mortgage loans: PROCESSES AN APPLICATION SUBMITTED BY AN INDIVIDUAL FOR A REVERSE MORTGAGE LOAN:(i) Provide in-person , face-to-face housing counseling to an applicant THE INDIVIDUAL WHO SUBMITTED THE APPLICATION from a housing counseling agency that is approved by the United States Department of Housing and <--<--<--123456789101112131415161718 Urban Development in this Commonwealth. The housing counseling agency shall provide advice on a reverse mortgage loan and alternatives to a reverse mortgage loan.(ii) If an applicant THE INDIVIDUAL is unable or chooses not to schedule an in-person, face-to-face visit with a housing counselor by either traveling to a housing counseling agency or having an in-home visit from a counselor, conduct the housing counseling over the telephone or through video teleconference.(iii) After completion of the housing counseling, issue to the applicant INDIVIDUAL a certificate that contains the following information:(A) The signatures of the applicant INDIVIDUAL and the housing counselor who provided the service.(B) The date on which the housing counseling services were provided.(C) The name, address and telephone number of both the applicant INDIVIDUAL who received counseling and the organization that provided the counseling.(iv) Maintain the certificate issued under subparagraph (iii) for the duration of the term of the loan.FOR PURPOSES OF THIS PARAGRAPH, THE TERM "REVERSE MORTGAGE LOAN" SHALL MEAN A LOAN, SECURED BY A MORTGAGE , THAT PAYS A HOMEOWNER LOAN PROCEEDS DRAWN FROM ACCUMULATED HOME EQUITY AND THAT REQUIRES NO REPAYMENT UNTIL A FUTURE TIME.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1466PN1973 - 2 - <--<--<--<--<--12345678910111213141516171819202122232425262728